Utah statutes.
73-3-28.   Replacement wells -- Requirements -- State engineer's approval -- Application to drill -- Filing -- Form -- Contents -- Notice -- Fees -- Definition -- Plugging of old well.

An existing well may be replaced with a replacement well within a radius of 150 feet from the existing well without the filing of a change application under Section 73-3-3, upon approval first having been obtained from the state engineer.

Such request for permission to drill a replacement well shall be filed with the state engineer upon a form to be furnished by the state engineer. Such form shall contain, but need not be limited to, the name and post office address of the person, corporation or association making the request. The number of the claim or application filed with the state engineer covering the well which is being replaced, the number of the award if in a decree, the reason for the replacement, the location of the replacement well with reference to the nearest United States land survey corner, and from the old well, and the name of the driller employed by the applicant to do the work.

No filing fee shall be required for the filing of such a request for permission to drill a replacement well and the state engineer need give only such notice as, in his judgment, is necessary to protect existing rights and in the event the state engineer shall determine that it is necessary to publish notice the advertising fee shall be paid in advance by the applicant.

The term "replacement well" as used herein means a new well drilled for the sole purpose of replacing an existing well which is impaired or made useless by structural difficulties and no new right in the use of water accrues. Upon completion of the new well the old well must be plugged by the applicant in a manner satisfactory to the state engineer.

